District of Columbia statutes.
21-514

Release of patients hospitalized under section 21-513.

Unless proceedings for hospitalization under court order have been initiated under subchapter IV of this chapter, a hospital, upon the written request of a patient hospitalized pursuant to section 21-513 , shall immediately release him.

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 753, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
This section is referenced in § 21-513.
1981 Ed., § 21-514.
1973 Ed., § 21-514.